Washington statutes.
RCW 18.227.070

Certification requirements.

The secretary shall issue a certification to any applicant who demonstrates to the satisfaction of the secretary that the applicant meets the following requirements:

(1) Graduation from a bachelor's degree program;

(2) Successful completion of a behavioral health support specialist program that is approved to meet standards consistent with the University of Washington behavioral health support specialist clinical training program guidelines, including a supervised clinical practicum with demonstrated clinical skills in core competencies; and

(3) Successful completion of an approved jurisprudential examination.

[ 2023 c 270 s 8.]